Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 74. Energy Efficiency Standards for Appliances and Equipment
§ 2798.
Testing, certification, labeling, and enforcement.

The Commissioner shall adopt test protocols for determining the energy efficiency of the new products covered by section 2794 of this title if those protocols are not provided for in section 2795 of this title or in the Residential Building Energy Standards adopted under

30 V.S.A. § 51

. The Commissioner shall require U.S. Department of Energy-approved test methods, or in the absence of those test methods, other appropriate nationally recognized test methods. The manufacturers of these products shall cause samples of their products to be tested in accordance with the test protocols adopted pursuant to this chapter or those specified in the Residential Building Energy Standards. The Commissioner may adopt updated test methods when new versions of test protocols become available.

Manufacturers of new products covered by section 2794 of this title, except for single voltage external AC to DC power supplies, shall certify to the Commissioner that these products are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter. These certifications shall be based on test results. The Commissioner shall adopt rules governing the certification of those products and shall coordinate with the certification programs of other states with similar standards.

Manufacturers of new products covered by section 2794 of this title shall identify each product offered for sale or installation in the State as being in compliance with the provisions of this chapter by means of a mark, label, or tag on the product and packaging at the time of sale or installation. The Commissioner shall adopt rules governing the identification of these products and packaging, which shall be coordinated to the greatest practical extent with the labeling programs of other states and federal agencies with equivalent efficiency standards. The Commissioner shall allow the use of existing marks, labels, or tags which connote compliance with the efficiency requirements of this chapter.

The Commissioner may test products covered by section 2794 of this title. If any product so tested is found not to be in compliance with the minimum efficiency standards established under section 2795 of this title, the Commissioner shall:

charge the manufacturer of that product for the cost of product purchase and testing; and

make available to the public information on products found not to be in compliance with the standards.

With prior notice and at reasonable and convenient hours, the Commissioner may cause periodic inspections to be made of distributors or retailers of new products covered by section 2794 of this title in order to determine compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

The Commissioner is granted the authority to adopt further rules as necessary to ensure the proper implementation of the provisions of this chapter.

Any manufacturer, or distributor, or any person who installs a product covered by this chapter for compensation, who violates any provision of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $250.00. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense, and each day that such violation continues shall constitute a separate offense. Penalties assessed under this subsection are in addition to costs assessed under subsection (d) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.